src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Basque noun morphology 

!! ## Locative nouns

!LEXICON Loccases
!
!+Ela:%>dik # ; !"from"
!+All:%>a # ; ! "to"
!+Term:%>aino # ; !"as far as, up to"
!+Ten:%>antz # ; ! "toward"

LEXICON NregLoc
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for C-final, points to precases or to ordinary Nreg
Precases ;
Nreg ;


LEXICON NaLoc 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  for a-final, points to precases or to Na
Precases ;
Na ;


LEXICON Precases 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  , nouns that can denote a location, they can take another case in addition
+Sg+Term:%>raino # ; !Terminal "as far as"
+Sg+LGen:%>ko # ;
+Sg+LGen+Art:%>koa # ;
+Sg+Ten:%>rantz # ; !Tendential "toward"



!! ## Ordinary nouns

LEXICON Nreg 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  for regular nouns, adding +N and pointing to Xreg

+N: Xreg ;

LEXICON Xreg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  common lexicon for regular nominals (A, N)
Precases ;
+Mgg: MggCases1 ;
+Mgg: MggCases2 ;
+Mgg: MggCases3 ;
+Art:%>a SgCases1 ;
+Art:%>a SgCases2 ;
+Art:%>a SgCases3 ;
+Art:%>a PlCases1 ;
+Art:%>a PlCases2 ;
+Art:%>a PlCases3 ;
!+N: Dim ;

LEXICON NregBizi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for the bizi ones
+N: Bizidun ;
+N+Art:%>a Bizidun ;
!+N: Dim ;

LEXICON Na
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** Vowel-final

+N+Mgg: MggCases1 ;
+N+Mgg: MggCases2 ;
+N+Mgg: MggCases3 ;
+N+Art: SgCases1 ;
+N+Art: SgCases2 ;
+N+Art: SgCases3 ;
+N+Art: PlCases1 ;
+N+Art: PlCases2 ;
+N+Art: PlCases3 ;
!+N: Dim ;

LEXICON NaBizi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for the vowel-final bizi ones
+N: Bizidun ;
+N+Art: Bizidun ;
!+N: Dim ;




LEXICON Bizidun 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** after animate noun phrases

+Sem/Biz: SgCases1 ;
+Sem/Biz: PlCases1 ;
+Sem/Biz: MggCases1 ;
+Sem/Biz:%>gan SgCases2 ;
+Sem/Biz:%>rengan PlCases2 ;
+Sem/Biz:%>rengan MggCases2 ;


!! ## Case-number lexica

!! ### Art cases

LEXICON SgCases1 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** first group
+Sg+Abs: # ; !-ak
+Sg+Erg:%>k # ; !-ek
+Sg+Dat:%>ri # ; !-ei

+Sg+PGen:%>ren # ; !-en
+Sg+Ins:%>z # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Sg+Soc:%>rekin # ; !-ekin
+Sg+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !-entzat
+Sg+Ben2:%>rengatik # ; !-agatik !-engatik

LEXICON SgCases2
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** second group
+Sg+Ine: # ; !-ean !-etan
!twolc rule - larunbata - larunbatean // isn't the lemma 'larunbat' here ? 
+Sg+All:%>ra # ; !-era !-etara
+Sg+Ela:%>tik # ; !-etik !-etatik

LEXICON SgCases3
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** third group
+Sg+LGen:%>ko # ; !-eko !-etako


LEXICON PlCases1 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** plural first gropu
+Pl+Abs:%>k # ;
+Pl+Erg:%>ek # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ei # ;

+Pl+PGen:%>en # ; 
+Pl+Ins:%>ez # ; 
+Pl+Soc:%>ekin # ;
+Pl+Ben:%>entzat # ;
+Pl+Ben2:%>engatik # ;

LEXICON PlCases2 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** plural second group
+Pl+Ine: # ;
+Pl+All:%>etara # ;
+Pl+Ela:%>etatik # ;

LEXICON PlCases3 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** plural third group
+Pl+LGen:%>etako # ;


!! ### Mgg cases

LEXICON MggCases1 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** first group
+Sg+Abs: # ;
+Sg+Erg:%>k # ;   !k
+Sg+Dat:%>ri # ;   !i

+Sg+PGen:%>ren # ;    !en
+Sg+Ins:%>z # ;       !ez,etaz,taz
+Sg+Soc:%>rekin # ;   !ekin
+Sg+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !entzat
+Sg+Ben2:%>rengatik # ;   !engatik

+Sg+Par:%>rik # ;

LEXICON MggCases2
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** second group
+Sg+Ine:%>etan # ;     !tan
+Sg+All:%>etara # ;    !tara
+Sg+Ela:%>etatik # ;   !tatik

LEXICON MggCases3
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** third group
+Sg+LGen:%>etako # ;   !tako
